Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB388.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.529 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to provide services pursuant
to this chapter shall provide a program for synchronization of medications when it is agreed among the
member, a provider, and a pharmacist that synchronization of multiple prescriptions for the treatment of a
chronic illness is in the best interest of the patient for the management or treatment of a chronic illness
provided that the medications:
(a) Are covered by the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care organization contracted to
provide services pursuant to this chapter;
(b) Are used for treatment and management of chronic conditions that are subject to refills;
(c) Are not a Schedule II controlled substance[ or a Schedule III controlled substance containing
hydrocodone];
(d) Meet all prior authorization criteria specific to the medications at the time of the synchronization
request;
(e) Are of a formulation that can be effectively split over required short fill periods to achieve
synchronization; and
(f) Do not have quantity limits or dose optimization criteria or requirements that would be violated in
fulfilling synchronization.
(2) When applicable to permit synchronization, the Department for Medicaid Services or a managed care
organization contracted to provide services pursuant to this chapter shall apply a prorated daily cost-sharing
rate to any medication dispensed by a network pharmacy pursuant to this section.
(3) Any dispensing fee shall not be prorated and shall be based on an individual prescription filled or refilled.
Section 2. KRS 218A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation,
ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or by his or her authorized agent under his or her immediate supervision and pursuant to
his or her order; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner;
(2) "Anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically and pharmacologically related to
testosterone that promotes muscle growth and includes those substances classified as Schedule III controlled
substances pursuant to KRS 218A.020 but does not include estrogens, progestins, and anticosteroids;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4) "Carfentanil" means any substance containing any quantity of carfentanil, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts
of isomers;
(5) "Certified community based palliative care program" means a palliative care program which has received
certification from the Joint Commission;
(6) "Child" means any person under the age of majority as specified in KRS 2.015;
(7) "Cocaine" means a substance containing any quantity of cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and
salts of isomers;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) "Controlled substance" means methamphetamine, or a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in Schedules I
through V and includes a controlled substance analogue;
(9) (a) "Controlled substance analogue," except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, means a
substance:
1. The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the structure of a controlled substance
in Schedule I or II; and
2. Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is
substantially similar to or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; or
3. With respect to a particular person, which such person represents or intends to have a stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system that is substantially similar to
or greater than the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II.
(b) Such term does not include:
1. Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application;
2. With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in effect for investigational
use for that person pursuant to federal law to the extent conduct with respect to such substance is
pursuant to such exemption; or
3. Any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before the exemption described
in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph takes effect with respect to that substance;
(10) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container or labeling of which, without
authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number, or device, or any
likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact manufactured,
distributed, or dispensed the substance;
(11) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the
lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the
substance for that delivery;
(12) "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance to or for
the use of an ultimate user;
(13) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance;
(14) "Dosage unit" means a single pill, capsule, ampule, liquid, or other form of administration available as a single
unit;
(15) "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic
Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, care, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or
animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in this subsection.
It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(16) "Fentanyl" means a substance containing any quantity of fentanyl, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of
isomers;
(17) "Fentanyl derivative" means a substance containing any quantity of any chemical compound, except
compounds specifically scheduled as controlled substances by statute or by administrative regulation pursuant
to this chapter, which is structurally derived from 1-ethyl-4-(N-phenylamido) piperadine:
(a) By substitution:

CHAPTER 38 3
1. At the 2-position of the 1-ethyl group with a phenyl, furan, thiophene, or ethyloxotetrazole ring
system; and
2. Of the terminal amido hydrogen atom with an alkyl, alkoxy, cycloalkyl, or furanyl group; and
(b) Which may be further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
1. By substitution on the N-phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or
halide substituents;
2. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with alkyl, allyl, alkoxy, hydroxy, or halide
substituents at the 2-, 3-, 5-, and/or 6- positions;
3. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with a phenyl, alkoxy, or carboxylate ester
substituent at the 4- position; or
4. By substitution on the 1-ethyl group to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, or hydroxy substituents;
(18) "Good-faith prior examination," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only, means an in-
person medical examination of the patient conducted by the prescribing practitioner or other health-care
professional routinely relied upon in the ordinary course of his or her practice, at which time the patient is
physically examined and a medical history of the patient is obtained. "In-person" includes telehealth
examinations. This subsection shall not be applicable to hospice providers licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter
216B;
(19) "Hazardous chemical substance" includes any chemical substance used or intended for use in the illegal
manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in this section or the illegal manufacture of
methamphetamine as defined in KRS 218A.1431, which:
(a) Poses an explosion hazard;
(b) Poses a fire hazard; or
(c) Is poisonous or injurious if handled, swallowed, or inhaled;
(20) "Heroin" means a substance containing any quantity of heroin, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(21) "Hydrocodone combination product" means a drug with:
(a) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of its salts, per one hundred
(100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater
quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; or
(b) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of its salts, per one hundred
(100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15) milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active,
nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(22) "Immediate precursor" means a substance which is the principal compound commonly used or produced
primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the
manufacture of a controlled substance or methamphetamine, the control of which is necessary to prevent,
curtail, or limit manufacture;
(23) "Industrial hemp" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(24) "Industrial hemp products" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(25) "Intent to manufacture" means any evidence which demonstrates a person's conscious objective to
manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine. Such evidence includes but is not limited to
statements and a chemical substance's usage, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other chemical
substances or equipment used to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine;
(26) "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may include the optical,
positional, or geometric isomer to classify any substance pursuant to KRS 218A.020;
(27) "Manufacture," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction
from substances of natural origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container except that this term does not include activities:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the
course of his or her professional practice;
(b) By a practitioner, or by his or her authorized agent under his or her supervision, for the purpose of, or
as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale; or
(c) By a pharmacist as an incident to his or her dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of his or
her professional practice;
(28) "Marijuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of these substances. The term "marijuana" does not include:
(a) Industrial hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person who holds a license issued by
the Department of Agriculture permitting that person to cultivate, handle, or process industrial hemp;
(b) Industrial hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds, leaf materials, or floral
materials;
(c) The substance cannabidiol, when transferred, dispensed, or administered pursuant to the written order
of a physician practicing at a hospital or associated clinic affiliated with a Kentucky public university
having a college or school of medicine;
(d) For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access program, a drug or substance
approved for the use of those participants by the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(e) A cannabidiol product derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS 260.850;
(f) For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product derived from industrial hemp,
as defined in KRS 260.850;
(g) A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the United States Food and Drug
Administration; or
(h) Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(29) "Medical history," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only, means an accounting of a
patient's medical background, including but not limited to prior medical conditions, prescriptions, and family
background;
(30) "Medical order," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only, means a lawful order of a
specifically identified practitioner for a specifically identified patient for the patient's health-care needs.
"Medical order" may or may not include a prescription drug order;
(31) "Medical record," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only, means a record, other than
for financial or billing purposes, relating to a patient, kept by a practitioner as a result of the practitioner-
patient relationship;
(32) "Methamphetamine" means any substance that contains any quantity of methamphetamine, or any of its salts,
isomers, or salts of isomers;
(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from
substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis:
(a) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate;
(b) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or
identical with any of the substances referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection, but not including the
isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
(c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and
derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed;

CHAPTER 38 5
(e) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(f) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and
(g) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of any of the substances referred to
in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection;
(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to
morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. It does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under KRS 218A.020, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). It does include its
racemic and levorotatory forms;
(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except its seeds;
(36) "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity;
(37) "Physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(38) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing;
(39) "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the practice of the profession of
pharmacy;
(40) "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, optometrist as
authorized in KRS 320.240, advanced practice registered nurse as authorized under KRS 314.011, physician
assistant as authorized under KRS 311.858, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by
state or federal law to acquire, distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to, or to administer a
controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state. "Practitioner" also includes
a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, optometrist, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered
nurse [authorized under KRS 314.011 ]who is a resident of and actively practicing in a state other than
Kentucky and who is licensed and has prescriptive authority for controlled substances under the professional
licensing laws of another state, unless the person's Kentucky license has been revoked, suspended, restricted,
or probated, in which case the terms of the Kentucky license shall prevail;
(41) "Practitioner-patient relationship," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution only, means a
medical relationship that exists between a patient and a practitioner or the practitioner's designee, after the
practitioner or his or her designee has conducted at least one (1) good-faith prior examination;
(42) "Prescription" means a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug or medicine, or combination or mixture of
drugs or medicines, or proprietary preparation, signed or given or authorized by a medical, dental, chiropody,
veterinarian, optometric practitioner, or advanced practice registered nurse, and intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or other animals;
(43) "Prescription blank," with reference to a controlled substance, means a document that meets the requirements
of KRS 218A.204 and 217.216;
(44) "Presumptive probation" means a sentence of probation not to exceed the maximum term specified for the
offense, subject to conditions otherwise authorized by law, that is presumed to be the appropriate sentence for
certain offenses designated in this chapter, notwithstanding contrary provisions of KRS Chapter 533. That
presumption shall only be overcome by a finding on the record by the sentencing court of substantial and
compelling reasons why the defendant cannot be safely and effectively supervised in the community, is not
amenable to community-based treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety;
(45) "Production" includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance;
(46) "Recovery program" means an evidence-based, nonclinical service that assists individuals and families
working toward sustained recovery from substance use and other criminal risk factors. This can be done
through an array of support programs and services that are delivered through residential and nonresidential
means;
(47) "Salvia" means Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A and includes all parts of the plant presently classified
botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of that
plant, and every compound, manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its seeds, or its
extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation of that plant, its seeds, or extracts. The term
shall not include any other species in the genus salvia;
(48) "Second or subsequent offense" means that for the purposes of this chapter an offense is considered as a
second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been
convicted under this chapter, or under any statute of the United States, or of any state relating to substances
classified as controlled substances or counterfeit substances, except that a prior conviction for a nontrafficking
offense shall be treated as a prior offense only when the subsequent offense is a nontrafficking offense. For the
purposes of this section, a conviction voided under KRS 218A.275 or 218A.276 shall not constitute a
conviction under this chapter;
(49) "Sell" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person for consideration or in furtherance of
commercial distribution;
(50) "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning it has in KRS 500.080;
(51) "Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines" means any chemical compound which is not approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with
state and federal law, that contains Benzylpiperazine (BZP); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine (TFMPP); 1,1-
Dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxytetrahydrocannabinol (HU-210); 1-Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-
naphthoyl)indole; dexanabinol (HU-211); or any compound in the following structural classes:
(a) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples
of this structural class include but are not limited to JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-
081, JWH-122, JWH-200, and AM-2201;
(b) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further substituted
in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and
RCS-8;
(c) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-
(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further substituted in
the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples
of this structural class include but are not limited to AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN
48,098), and RCS-4;
(d) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with
substitution at the 5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not
substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not
limited to CP 47,497 and its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);
(e) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not
further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to
any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to JWH-175, JWH-184, and
JWH-185;
(f) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further substituted
in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-
307, and JWH-368;

CHAPTER 38 7
(g) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene structure with
substitution at the 3-position of the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not
further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to
any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to JWH-176;
(h) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not further substituted
in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not
limited to UR-144 and XLR-11;
(i) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole structure with substitution at
the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted
in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the adamantyl ring system to any
extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to AB-001 and AM-1248; or
(j) Any other synthetic cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and
federal law;
(52) "Synthetic cathinones" means any chemical compound which is not approved by the United States Food and
Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal
law (not including bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule) structurally derived from 2-
aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl, or thiophene ring systems,
whether or not the compound is further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy, alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl,
or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other
univalent substituents. Examples of this class include but are not limited to 3,4-
Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA);
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent. Examples of this class include but are
not limited to 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-one (buphedrone);
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or methoxybenzyl groups, or
by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure. Examples of this class include but are
not limited to Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and -Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (-PPP); or
(d) Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state or federal law;
(53) "Synthetic drugs" means any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any synthetic cathinones;
(54) "Telehealth" has the same meaning it has in KRS 211.332;
(55) "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the
resinous extractives of the plant Cannabis, sp. or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with
similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(a) Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
(b) Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; and
(c) Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(56) "Traffic," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means to manufacture, distribute, dispense, sell, transfer, or
possess with intent to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or sell a controlled substance;
(57) "Transfer" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person without consideration and not in
furtherance of commercial distribution; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(58) "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for his or her own use or for the
use of a member of his or her household or for administering to an animal owned by him or her or by a
member of his or her household.
Section 3. KRS 218A.172 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 218A.205(3) shall require that, prior to the initial
prescribing or dispensing of any Schedule II controlled substance [or a Schedule III controlled substance
containing hydrocodone ]to a human patient, a practitioner shall:
(a) Obtain a medical history and conduct a physical or mental health examination of the patient, as
appropriate to the patient's medical complaint, and document the information in the patient's medical
record;
(b) Query the electronic monitoring system established in KRS 218A.202 for all available data on the
patient for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the patient encounter and appropriately
utilize that data in the evaluation and treatment of the patient;
(c) Make a written plan stating the objectives of the treatment and further diagnostic examinations
required;
(d) Discuss the risks and benefits of the use of controlled substances with the patient, the patient's parent if
the patient is an unemancipated minor child, or the patient's legal guardian or health care surrogate,
including the risk of tolerance and drug dependence; and
(e) Obtain written consent for the treatment.
(2) (a) Administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 218A.205(3) shall require that a practitioner
prescribing or dispensing additional amounts of Schedule II controlled substances [or Schedule III
controlled substances containing hydrocodone ]for the same medical complaint and related symptoms
shall:
1. Review, at reasonable intervals based on the patient's individual circumstances and course of
treatment, the plan of care;
2. Provide to the patient any new information about the treatment; and
3. Modify or terminate the treatment as appropriate.
(b) If the course of treatment extends beyond three (3) months, the administrative regulations shall also
require that the practitioner:
1. Query the electronic monitoring system established in KRS 218A.202 no less than once every
three (3) months for all available data on the patient for the twelve (12) month period
immediately preceding the query; and
2. Review that data before issuing any new prescription or refills for the patient for any Schedule II
controlled substance[ or a Schedule III controlled substance containing hydrocodone].
(3) Administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 218A.205(3) shall require that[,] for each patient for
whom a practitioner prescribes any Schedule II controlled substance [or a Schedule III controlled substance
containing hydrocodone, ]the practitioner shall keep accurate, readily accessible, and complete medical
records which include, as appropriate:
(a) Medical history and physical or mental health examination;
(b) Diagnostic, therapeutic, and laboratory results;
(c) Evaluations and consultations;
(d) Treatment objectives;
(e) Discussion of risk, benefits, and limitations of treatments;
(f) Treatments;
(g) Medications, including date, type, dosage, and quantity prescribed or dispensed;
(h) Instructions and agreements; and
(i) Periodic reviews of the patient's file.

CHAPTER 38 9
(4) Administrative regulations promulgated under KRS 218A.205(3) may exempt, in whole or in part, compliance
with the mandatory diagnostic, treatment, review, and other protocols and standards established in this section
for:
(a) A licensee prescribing or administering a controlled substance immediately prior to, during, or within
the fourteen (14) days following an operative or invasive procedure or a delivery if the prescribing or
administering is medically related to the operative or invasive procedure or the delivery and the
medication usage does not extend beyond the fourteen (14) days;
(b) A licensee prescribing or administering a controlled substance necessary to treat a patient in an
emergency situation;
(c) A licensed pharmacist or other person licensed by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy to dispense drugs
or a licensed pharmacy;
(d) A licensee prescribing or dispensing a controlled substance:
1. For administration in a hospital or long-term-care facility if the hospital or long-term-care facility
with an institutional account, or a practitioner in those hospitals or facilities where no
institutional account exists, queries the electronic monitoring system established in KRS
218A.202 for all available data on the patient or resident for the twelve (12) month period
immediately preceding the query within twelve (12) hours of the patient's or resident's admission
and places a copy of the query in the patient's or resident's medical records during the duration of
the patient's stay at the facility;
2. As part of the patient's hospice or end-of-life treatment;
3. For the treatment of pain associated with cancer or with the treatment of cancer;
4. In a single dose to relieve the anxiety, pain, or discomfort experienced by a patient submitting to
a diagnostic test or procedure;
5. Within seven (7) days of an initial prescribing or dispensing under subsection (1) of this section
if the prescribing or dispensing:
a. Is done as a substitute for the initial prescribing or dispensing;
b. Cancels any refills for the initial prescription; and
c. Requires the patient to dispose of any remaining unconsumed medication;
6. Within ninety (90) days of an initial prescribing or dispensing under subsection (1) of this section
if the prescribing or dispensing is done by another practitioner in the same practice or in an
existing coverage arrangement, if done for the same patient for the same medical condition; or
7. To a research subject enrolled in a research protocol approved by an institutional review board
that has an active federalwide assurance number from the United States Department of Health
and Human Services, Office for Human Research Protections, where the research involves
single, double, or triple blind drug administration or is additionally covered by a certificate of
confidentiality from the National Institutes of Health;
(e) The prescribing of a Schedule III, IV, or V controlled substance by a licensed optometrist to a patient in
accordance with the provisions of KRS 320.240; or
(f) The prescribing of a three (3) day supply of a Schedule III controlled substance following the
performance of oral surgery by a dentist licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 313.
(5) (a) A state licensing board promulgating administrative regulations under KRS 218A.205(3) may
promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A authorizing exemptions
supplemental or in addition to those specified in subsection (4) of this section. Prior to exercising this
authority, the board shall:
1. Notify the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy that it is considering a proposal to
promulgate an administrative regulation authorizing exemptions supplemental or in addition to
those specified in subsection (4) of this section and invite the office to participate in the board
meeting at which the proposal will be considered;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Make a factual finding based on expert testimony as well as evidence or research submitted to
the board that the exemption demonstrates a low risk of diversion or abuse and is supported by
the dictates of good medical practice; and
3. Submit a report to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission of its actions,
including a detailed explanation of the factual and policy basis underlying the board's action. A
copy of this report shall be provided to the regulations compiler.
(b) Within one (1) working day of promulgating an administrative regulation authorizing an exemption
under this section, the promulgating board shall email[e-mail] to the Kentucky Office of Drug Control
Policy:
1. A copy of the administrative regulation as filed, and all attachments required by KRS
13A.230(1); and
2. A request from the board that the office review the administrative regulation in the same manner
as would the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy under KRS 11.202(1)(e),
and submit its report or comments in accordance with the deadline established in KRS
13A.270(1)(c). A copy of the report or comments shall be filed with the regulations compiler.
Section 4. KRS 218A.182 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 218A.180 or any other state law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2021, no
practitioner shall issue any prescription for a controlled substance unless the prescription is made by electronic
prescription from the practitioner issuing the prescription to a pharmacy, except for prescriptions issued:
(a) By veterinarians;
(b) In circumstances where electronic prescribing is not available due to temporary technological or
electrical failure;
(c) By a practitioner to be dispensed by a pharmacy located outside the state;
(d) When the prescriber and dispenser are the same entity;
(e) That include elements that are not supported by the most recently implemented version of the National
Council for Prescription Drug Programs Prescriber/Pharmacist Interface SCRIPT Standard;
(f) By a practitioner for a drug that contains certain elements that cannot be incorporated as required by the
United States Food and Drug Administration with electronic prescribing, including extemporaneous
compounding;
(g) By a practitioner allowing for the dispensing of a nonpatient specific prescription under a standing
order, approved protocol for drug therapy, or collaborative drug management or comprehensive
medication management, in response to a public health emergency;
(h) By a practitioner prescribing a drug under a research protocol;
(i) By practitioners who have received a waiver or a renewal thereof, from the requirement to use
electronic prescribing due to economic hardship, technological limitations that are not reasonably
within the control of the practitioner, or other exceptional circumstance demonstrated by the
practitioner. The initial waiver and each subsequent waiver renewal shall not exceed one (1) year per
waiver or waiver renewal;
(j) By a practitioner under circumstances where, notwithstanding the practitioner's present ability to make
an electronic prescription as required by this subsection, the practitioner reasonably determines that it
would be impractical for the patient to obtain substances prescribed by electronic prescription in a
timely manner, and delay would adversely impact the patient's medical condition;
(k) By a practitioner for an individual who receives hospice care;[ or]
(l) By a practitioner for an individual who is a resident of a nursing facility; or
(m) By a practitioner who is issuing a prescription as part of providing charitable health care services
pursuant to the Kentucky Charitable Health Care Services Act, KRS 216.940 to 216.945.
(2) A pharmacist who receives a written, oral, or faxed prescription for a controlled substance shall not be
required to verify that the prescription properly falls under one (1) of the exceptions from the requirement to

CHAPTER 38 11
electronically prescribe. Pharmacists may continue to dispense medications from otherwise valid written, oral,
or fax prescriptions that are consistent with current laws and administrative regulations.
(3) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section including enforcement
mechanisms, waivers of requirements, and appropriate penalties for violations.
Section 5. KRS 218A.202 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(b) "Cannabis business" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(c) "Controlled substance" means any Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance and does not include
medicinal cannabis;
(d) "Dispensary" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(e) "Dispensary agent" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(f) "Disqualifying felony offense" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(g) "Medicinal cannabis" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(h) "Medicinal cannabis practitioner" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(i) "Registry identification card" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(j) "State licensing board" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010;
(k) "Use of medicinal cannabis" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010; and
(l) "Written certification" has the same meaning as in KRS 218B.010.
(2) The cabinet shall establish and maintain an electronic system for monitoring Schedules II, III, IV, and V
controlled substances and medicinal cannabis. The cabinet may contract for the design, upgrade, or operation
of this system if the contract preserves all of the rights, privileges, and protections guaranteed to Kentucky
citizens under this chapter and the contract requires that all other aspects of the system be operated in
conformity with the requirements of this or any other applicable state or federal law.
(3) For the purpose of monitoring the prescribing and dispensing of Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled
substances:
(a) A practitioner or a pharmacist authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances to humans shall
register with the cabinet to use the system provided for in this section and shall maintain an active
account with the electronic monitoring system[such registration] continuously during the practitioner's
or pharmacist's term of licensure and shall not have to pay a fee or tax specifically dedicated to the
operation of the system;
(b) Every practitioner or pharmacy which dispenses a controlled substance to a person in Kentucky, or to a
person at an address in Kentucky, shall report to the cabinet the data required by this section, which
includes the reporting of any Schedule II controlled substance dispensed at a facility licensed by the
cabinet and a Schedule II through Schedule V controlled substance regardless of dosage when
dispensed by the emergency department of a hospital to an emergency department patient. Reporting
shall not be required for:
1. A drug administered directly to a patient in a hospital, a resident of a health care facility licensed
under KRS Chapter 216B, a resident of a child-caring facility as defined by KRS 199.011, or an
individual in a jail, correctional facility, or juvenile detention facility;
2. A Schedule III through Schedule V controlled substance dispensed by a facility licensed by the
cabinet provided that the quantity dispensed is limited to an amount adequate to treat the patient
for a maximum of forty-eight (48) hours and is not dispensed by the emergency department of a
hospital; or
3. A drug administered or dispensed to a research subject enrolled in a research protocol approved
by an institutional review board that has an active federalwide assurance number from the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, Office for Human Research Protections,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
where the research involves single, double, or triple blind drug administration or is additionally
covered by a certificate of confidentiality from the National Institutes of Health;
(c) In addition to the data required by paragraph (d) of this subsection, a Kentucky-licensed acute care
hospital or critical access hospital shall report to the cabinet all positive toxicology screens that were
performed by the hospital's emergency department to evaluate the patient's suspected drug overdose;
(d) Data for each controlled substance that is reported shall include but not be limited to the following:
1. Patient identifier;
2. National drug code of the drug dispensed;
3. Date of dispensing;
4. Quantity dispensed;
5. Prescriber; and
6. Dispenser;
(e) The data shall be provided in the electronic format specified by the cabinet unless a waiver has been
granted by the cabinet to an individual dispenser. The cabinet shall establish acceptable error tolerance
rates for data. Dispensers shall ensure that reports fall within these tolerances. Incomplete or inaccurate
data shall be corrected upon notification by the cabinet if the dispenser exceeds these error tolerance
rates;
(f) The cabinet shall only disclose data to persons and entities authorized to receive that data under this
subsection. Disclosure to any other person or entity, including disclosure in the context of a civil action
where the disclosure is sought either for the purpose of discovery or for evidence, is prohibited unless
specifically authorized by this section. The cabinet shall be authorized to provide data to:
1. A designated representative of a board responsible for the licensure, regulation, or discipline of
practitioners, pharmacists, or other person who is authorized to prescribe, administer, or dispense
controlled substances and who is involved in a bona fide specific investigation involving a
designated person;
2. Employees of the Office of the Inspector General of the cabinet who have successfully
completed training for the electronic system and who have been approved to use the system,
federal prosecutors, Kentucky Commonwealth's attorneys and assistant Commonwealth's
attorneys, county attorneys and assistant county attorneys, a peace officer certified pursuant to
KRS 15.380 to 15.404, a certified or full-time peace officer of another state, or a federal agent
whose duty is to enforce the laws of this Commonwealth, of another state, or of the United States
relating to drugs and who is engaged in a bona fide specific investigation involving a designated
person;
3. A state-operated Medicaid program in conformity with paragraph (g) of this subsection;
4. A properly convened grand jury pursuant to a subpoena properly issued for the records;
5. A practitioner or pharmacist, or employee of the practitioner's or pharmacist's practice acting
under the specific direction of the practitioner or pharmacist, who certifies that the requested
information is for the purpose of:
a. Providing medical or pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide current or prospective
patient;
b. Reviewing data on controlled substances that have been reported for the birth mother of
an infant who is currently being treated by the practitioner for neonatal abstinence
syndrome, or has symptoms that suggest prenatal drug exposure; or
c. Reviewing and assessing the individual prescribing or dispensing patterns of the
practitioner or pharmacist or to determine the accuracy and completeness of information
contained in the monitoring system;
6. The chief medical officer of a hospital or long-term-care facility, an employee of the hospital or
long-term-care facility as designated by the chief medical officer and who is working under his
or her specific direction, or a physician designee if the hospital or facility has no chief medical

CHAPTER 38 13
officer, if the officer, employee, or designee certifies that the requested information is for the
purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide current or prospective
patient or resident in the hospital or facility;
7. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure, for any physician who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a physician who is already under
investigation by the Board of Medical Licensure for improper prescribing or dispensing
practices;
b. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates a substantial likelihood
that inappropriate prescribing or dispensing may be occurring; or
c. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another physician in that area
indicates a substantial likelihood that inappropriate prescribing or dispensing may be
occurring in that area;
8. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the Kentucky
Board of Nursing, for any advanced practice registered nurse who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a physician who is already under
investigation by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure for improper prescribing or
dispensing practices;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an advanced practice registered
nurse who is already under investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper prescribing
practices;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates a substantial likelihood
that inappropriate prescribing or dispensing may be occurring; or
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on a physician or another advanced
practice registered nurse in that area indicates a substantial likelihood that inappropriate
prescribing or dispensing may be occurring in that area;
9. A judge or a probation or parole officer administering a diversion or probation program of a
criminal defendant arising out of a violation of this chapter or of a criminal defendant who is
documented by the court as a substance abuser who is eligible to participate in a court-ordered
drug diversion or probation program; or
10. A medical examiner engaged in a death investigation pursuant to KRS 72.026;
(g) The Department for Medicaid Services shall use any data or reports from the system for the purpose of
identifying Medicaid providers or recipients whose prescribing, dispensing, or usage of controlled
substances may be:
1. Appropriately managed by a single outpatient pharmacy or primary care physician; or
2. Indicative of improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing practices by a
practitioner or drug seeking by a Medicaid recipient;
(h) A person who receives data or any report of the system from the cabinet shall not provide it to any other
person or entity except as provided in this subsection, in another statute, or by order of a court of
competent jurisdiction and only to a person or entity authorized to receive the data or the report under
this section, except that:
1. A person specified in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection who is authorized to receive data or a
report may share that information with any other persons specified in paragraph (f)2. of this
subsection authorized to receive data or a report if the persons specified in paragraph (f)2. of this
subsection are working on a bona fide specific investigation involving a designated person. Both
the person providing and the person receiving the data or report under this subparagraph shall
document in writing each person to whom the data or report has been given or received and the
day, month, and year that the data or report has been given or received. This document shall be
maintained in a file by each agency engaged in the investigation;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. A representative of the Department for Medicaid Services may share data or reports regarding
overutilization by Medicaid recipients with a board designated in paragraph (f)1. of this
subsection, or with a law enforcement officer designated in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection;
3. The Department for Medicaid Services may submit the data as evidence in an administrative
hearing held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
4. If a state licensing board as defined in KRS 218A.205 initiates formal disciplinary proceedings
against a licensee, and data obtained by the board is relevant to the charges, the board may
provide the data to the licensee and his or her counsel, as part of the notice process required by
KRS 13B.050, and admit the data as evidence in an administrative hearing conducted pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13B, with the board and licensee taking all necessary steps to prevent further
disclosure of the data; and
5. A practitioner, pharmacist, or employee who obtains data under paragraph (f)5. of this subsection
may share the report with the patient or person authorized to act on the patient's behalf. Any
practitioner, pharmacist, or employee who obtains data under paragraph (f)5. of this subsection
may place the report in the patient's medical record, in which case the individual report shall then
be deemed a medical record subject to disclosure on the same terms and conditions as an
ordinary medical record in lieu of the disclosure restrictions otherwise imposed by this section;
(i) The cabinet, all peace officers specified in paragraph (f)2. of this subsection, all officers of the court,
and all regulatory agencies and officers, in using the data for investigative or prosecution purposes,
shall consider the nature of the prescriber's and dispenser's practice and the condition for which the
patient is being treated;
(j) Intentional failure to comply with the reporting requirements of this subsection shall be a Class B
misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for each subsequent offense; and
(k) If the cabinet becomes aware of a prescriber's or dispenser's failure to comply with this section, the
cabinet shall notify the licensing board or agency responsible for licensing the prescriber or dispenser.
The licensing board shall treat the notification as a complaint against the license.
(4) For the purpose of monitoring the cultivation, processing, production, recommending, and dispensing of
medicinal cannabis:
(a) Every medicinal cannabis practitioner who is authorized pursuant to KRS 218B.050 to provide written
certifications for the use of medicinal cannabis and every cannabis business licensed under KRS
218B.080, 218B.085, and 218B.090 shall register with the cabinet to use the system provided for in this
section and shall maintain such registration continuously during the medicinal cannabis practitioner's
authorization to provide written certifications or a cannabis business's term of licensure and shall not
have to pay a fee or tax specifically dedicated to the operation of the system;
(b) No later than July 1, 2024, the cabinet shall ensure that the system provided for in this section allows:
1. Medicinal cannabis practitioners to record the issuance of written certifications to a patient as
required by KRS 218B.050;
2. The cabinet, law enforcement personnel, and dispensary agents to verify the validity of registry
identification cards issued by the cabinet. When verifying the validity of an identification card,
the system shall only disclose whether the identification card is valid and whether the cardholder
is a registered qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or designated caregiver;
3. Dispensary agents to record the amount of medicinal cannabis that is dispensed to a cardholder
during each transaction, as required by KRS 218B.110;
4. Law enforcement personnel and dispensary agents to access medicinal cannabis sales data
recorded by dispensary agents pursuant to KRS 218B.110;
5. The sharing of dispensing data recorded by dispensary agents, pursuant to KRS 218B.110, with
all licensed dispensaries in real time;
6. Licensed cannabis businesses to record data required by administrative regulations promulgated
pursuant to KRS 218B.140 to facilitate the tracking of medicinal cannabis from the point of
cultivation to the point of sale to cardholders; and

CHAPTER 38 15
7. The cabinet to track all medicinal cannabis in the state from the point of cultivation to the point
of sale to a cardholder;
(c) The cabinet shall only disclose data related to the cultivation, production, recommending, and
dispensing of medicinal cannabis to persons and entities authorized to receive that data under this
subsection. Disclosure to any other person or entity, including disclosure in the context of a civil action
where the disclosure is sought either for the purpose of discovery or for evidence, is prohibited unless
specifically authorized by this subsection. The cabinet shall be authorized to provide data to:
1. Any person or entity authorized to receive data pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection;
2. A designated representative of a state licensing board responsible for the licensure, regulation, or
discipline of medicinal cannabis practitioners and who is involved in a bona fide specific
investigation involving a designated person;
3. Employees of the Office of the Inspector General of the cabinet who have successfully
completed training for the electronic system and who have been approved to use the system,
Kentucky Commonwealth's attorneys and assistant Commonwealth's attorneys, and county
attorneys and assistant county attorneys who are engaged in a bona fide specific investigation
involving a designated person;
4. A properly convened grand jury pursuant to a subpoena properly issued for the records;
5. A medicinal cannabis practitioner or an employee of a medicinal cannabis practitioner's practice
acting under the specific direction of the medicinal cannabis practitioner, who certifies that the
request for information is for the purpose of complying with KRS 218B.050(4)(c);
6. The chief medical officer of a hospital or long-term-care facility, an employee of the hospital or
long-term-care facility as designated by the chief medical officer and who is working under his
or her specific direction, or a physician designee if the hospital or facility has no chief medical
officer, if the officer, employee, or designee certifies that the requested information is for the
purpose of providing medical or pharmaceutical treatment to a bona fide current or prospective
patient or resident in the hospital or facility;
7. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure, for any physician who is:
a. Associated in a partnership, other business entity, or supervision agreement established
pursuant to KRS 311.854 with a physician who is already under investigation by the
Board of Medical Licensure for improper issuance of written certifications;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an advanced practice registered
nurse who is already under investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper issuance of
written certifications;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates a substantial likelihood
that inappropriate issuance of written certifications may be occurring; or
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another physician in that area
indicates a substantial likelihood that inappropriate issuance of written certifications may
be occurring in that area;
8. In addition to the purposes authorized under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the Kentucky
Board of Nursing, for any advanced practice registered nurse who is:
a. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with a physician who is already under
investigation by the Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure for improper issuance of
written certifications;
b. Associated in a partnership or other business entity with an advanced practice registered
nurse who is already under investigation by the Board of Nursing for improper issuance of
written certifications;
c. In a designated geographic area for which a trend report indicates a substantial likelihood
that inappropriate issuance of written certifications may be occurring; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
d. In a designated geographic area for which a report on another advanced practice registered
nurse in that area indicates a substantial likelihood that inappropriate issuance of written
certifications may be occurring in that area;
9. A judge or a probation or parole officer administering a diversion or probation program of a
criminal defendant arising out of a violation of this chapter or of a criminal defendant who is
documented by the court as a substance abuser who is eligible to participate in a court-ordered
drug diversion or probation program;
10. A medical examiner engaged in a death investigation pursuant to KRS 72.026; or
11. The Legislative Research Commission, the University of Kentucky College of Medicine, or the
Kentucky Center for Cannabis established in KRS 164.983 if the cabinet determines that
disclosing data related to the cultivation, production, recommending, and dispensing of
medicinal cannabis to the Legislative Research Commission, the University of Kentucky College
of Medicine, or the Kentucky Center for Cannabis is necessary to comply with the reporting
requirements established in KRS 218B.020(8); and
(d) A person who receives data or any report of the system from the cabinet shall not provide it to any other
person or entity except as provided in this section, in another statute, or by order of a court of competent
jurisdiction and only to a person or entity authorized to receive the data or the report under this section,
except that:
1. A person specified in paragraph (c)3. of this subsection who is authorized to receive data or a
report may share that information with any other persons specified in paragraph (c)3. of this
subsection authorized to receive data or a report if the persons specified in paragraph (c)3. of this
subsection are working on a bona fide specific investigation involving a designated person. Both
the person providing and the person receiving the data or report under this subparagraph shall
document in writing each person to whom the data or report has been given or received and the
day, month, and year that the data or report has been given or received. This document shall be
maintained in a file by each agency engaged in the investigation;
2. If a state licensing board initiates formal disciplinary proceedings against a licensee, and data
obtained by the board is relevant to the charges, the board may provide the data to the licensee
and his or her counsel, as part of the notice process required by KRS 13B.050, and admit the data
as evidence in an administrative hearing conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, with the board
and licensee taking all necessary steps to prevent further disclosure of the data; and
3. A medicinal cannabis practitioner or an employee of a medicinal cannabis practitioner's practice
acting under the specific direction of the medicinal cannabis practitioner who obtains data under
paragraph (c)5. of this subsection may share the report with the patient or person authorized to
act on the patient's behalf. Any medicinal cannabis practitioner or employee who obtains data
under paragraph (c)5. of this subsection may place the report in the patient's medical record, in
which case the individual report shall then be deemed a medical record subject to disclosure on
the same terms and conditions as an ordinary medical record in lieu of the disclosure restrictions
otherwise imposed by this section.
(5) The data contained in, and any report obtained from, the electronic system for monitoring established pursuant
to this section shall not be a public record, except that the Department for Medicaid Services may submit the
data as evidence in an administrative hearing held in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(6) Intentional disclosure of transmitted data to a person not authorized by subsection (3)(f) to (h) or (4)(c) and (d)
of this section or authorized by KRS 315.121, or obtaining information under this section not relating to a bona
fide current or prospective patient or a bona fide specific investigation, shall be a Class B misdemeanor for the
first offense and a Class A misdemeanor for each subsequent offense.
(7) The cabinet may, by promulgating an administrative regulation, limit the length of time that data remain in the
electronic system. Any data removed from the system shall be archived and subject to retrieval within a
reasonable time after a request from a person authorized to review data under this section.
(8) (a) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall work with each board responsible for the licensure,
regulation, or discipline of practitioners, pharmacists, or other persons who are authorized to prescribe,
administer, or dispense controlled substances for the development of a continuing education program
about the purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring established in this section.

CHAPTER 38 17
(b) The cabinet shall work with each board responsible for the licensure, regulation, or discipline of
medicinal cannabis practitioners for the development of a continuing education program about the
purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring established in this section.
(c) The cabinet shall work with the Kentucky Bar Association for the development of a continuing
education program for attorneys about the purposes and uses of the electronic system for monitoring
established in this section.
(d) The cabinet shall work with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for the development of a continuing
education program for law enforcement officers about the purposes and uses of the electronic system
for monitoring established in this section.
(e) The cabinet shall develop a training program for cannabis business agents about the purposes and uses
of the electronic system for monitoring established in this section.
(9) The cabinet, Office of Inspector General, shall conduct quarterly reviews to identify patterns of potential
improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing of a controlled substance, issuance of written
certifications, or cultivation, processing, or dispensing of medicinal cannabis. The Office of Inspector General
may independently investigate and submit findings and recommendations to the appropriate boards of
licensure or other reporting agencies.
(10) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
the provisions of this section. Included in these administrative regulations shall be:
(a) An error resolution process allowing a patient to whom a report had been disclosed under subsections
(3) and (4) of this section to request the correction of inaccurate information contained in the system
relating to that patient; and
(b) A requirement that data be reported to the system under subsection (3)(b) of this section within one (1)
day of dispensing.
(11) (a) Before July 1, 2018, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward data regarding any felony or
Class A misdemeanor conviction that involves the trafficking or possession of a controlled substance or
other prohibited acts under KRS Chapter 218A for the previous five (5) calendar years to the cabinet for
inclusion in the electronic monitoring system established under this section. On or after July 1, 2018,
such data shall be forwarded by the Administrative Office of the Courts to the cabinet on a continuing
basis. The cabinet shall incorporate the data received into the system so that a query by patient name
indicates any prior drug conviction.
(b) Before July 1, 2024, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall forward all available data regarding
any disqualifying felony offense for the previous five (5) calendar years to the cabinet for inclusion in
the electronic monitoring system established under this section. On or after July 1, 2024, such data shall
be forwarded by the Administrative Office of the Courts to the cabinet on a continuing basis. The
cabinet shall incorporate the data received into the system so that a query by patient name indicates any
prior disqualifying felony conviction.
Section 6. KRS 218A.205 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Reporting agency" includes:
1. The Department of Kentucky State Police;
2. The Office of the Attorney General;
3. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
4. The applicable state licensing board; and
(b) "State licensing board" means:
1. The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure;
2. The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
3. The Kentucky Board of Dentistry;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. The Kentucky Board of Optometric Examiners;
5. The State Board of Podiatry; and
6. Any other board that licenses or regulates a person who is entitled to prescribe or dispense
controlled substances to humans.
(2) (a) When a reporting agency or a law enforcement agency receives a report of improper, inappropriate, or
illegal prescribing or dispensing of a controlled substance it may, to the extent otherwise allowed by
law, send a copy of the report within three (3) business days to every other reporting agency.
(b) A county attorney or Commonwealth's attorney shall notify the Office of the Attorney General and the
appropriate state licensing board within three (3) business days of an indictment or a waiver of
indictment becoming public in his or her jurisdiction charging a licensed person with a felony offense
relating to the manufacture of, trafficking in, prescribing, dispensing, or possession of a controlled
substance.
(3) Each state licensing board shall, in consultation with the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy, establish the
following by administrative regulation for those licensees authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled
substances:
(a) Mandatory prescribing and dispensing standards related to controlled substances, the requirements of
which shall include the diagnostic, treatment, review, and other protocols and standards established for
Schedule II controlled substances [and Schedule III controlled substances containing hydrocodone
]under KRS 218A.172 and which may include the exemptions authorized by KRS 218A.172(4);
(b) In accord with the CDC Guideline for Prescribing Opioids for Chronic Pain published in 2016, a
prohibition on a practitioner issuing a prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance for more than
a three (3) day supply of a Schedule II controlled substance if the prescription is intended to treat pain
as an acute medical condition, with the following exceptions:
1. The practitioner, in his or her professional judgment, believes that more than a three (3) day
supply of a Schedule II controlled substance is medically necessary to treat the patient's pain as
an acute medical condition and the practitioner adequately documents the acute medical
condition and lack of alternative treatment options which justifies deviation from the three (3)
day supply limit established in this subsection in the patient's medical records;
2. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to treat chronic pain;
3. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to treat pain associated with
a valid cancer diagnosis;
4. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to treat pain while the
patient is receiving hospice or end-of-life treatment or is receiving care from a certified
community based palliative care program;
5. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed as part of a narcotic
treatment program licensed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
6. The prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed to treat pain following a
major surgery or the treatment of significant trauma, as defined by the state licensing board in
consultation with the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy;
7. The Schedule II controlled substance is dispensed or administered directly to an ultimate user in
an inpatient setting; or
8. Any additional treatment scenario deemed medically necessary by the state licensing board in
consultation with the Kentucky Office of Drug Control Policy.
Nothing in this paragraph shall authorize a state licensing board to promulgate regulations which
expand any practitioner's prescriptive authority beyond that which existed prior to June 29, 2017;
(c) A prohibition on a practitioner dispensing greater than a forty-eight (48) hour supply of any Schedule II
controlled substance [or a Schedule III controlled substance containing hydrocodone ]unless the
dispensing is done as part of a narcotic treatment program licensed by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services;

CHAPTER 38 19
(d) A procedure for temporarily suspending, limiting, or restricting a license held by a named licensee
where a substantial likelihood exists to believe that the continued unrestricted practice by the named
licensee would constitute a danger to the health, welfare, or safety of the licensee's patients or of the
general public;
(e) A procedure for the expedited review of complaints filed against their licensees pertaining to the
improper, inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing of controlled substances that is designed to
commence an investigation within seven (7) days of a complaint being filed and produce a charging
decision by the board on the complaint within one hundred twenty (120) days of the receipt of the
complaint, unless an extension for a definite period of time is requested by a law enforcement agency
due to an ongoing criminal investigation;
(f) The establishment and enforcement of licensure standards that conform to the following:
1. A permanent ban on licensees and applicants convicted after July 20, 2012, in this state or any
other state of any felony offense relating to controlled substances from prescribing or dispensing
a controlled substance;
2. Restrictions short of a permanent ban on licensees and applicants convicted in this state or any
other state of any misdemeanor offense relating to prescribing or dispensing a controlled
substance;
3. Restrictions mirroring in time and scope any disciplinary limitation placed on a licensee or
applicant by a licensing board of another state if the disciplinary action results from improper,
inappropriate, or illegal prescribing or dispensing of controlled substances; and
4. A requirement that licensees and applicants report to the board any conviction or disciplinary
action covered by this subsection with appropriate sanctions for any failure to make this required
report;
(g) A procedure for the continuous submission of all disciplinary and other reportable information to the
National Practitioner Data Bank of the United States Department of Health and Human Services;
(h) If not otherwise required by other law, a process for submitting a query on each applicant for licensure
to the National Practitioner Data Bank of the United States Department of Health and Human Services
to retrieve any relevant data on the applicant; and
(i) Continuing education requirements beginning with the first full educational year occurring after July 1,
2012, that specify that at least seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the continuing education required
of the licensed practitioner relate to the use of the electronic monitoring system established in KRS
218A.202, pain management, or addiction disorders.
(4) For the purposes of pharmacy dispensing, the medical necessity for a Schedule II controlled substance as
documented by the practitioner in the patient's medical record and the prescription for more than a three (3)
day supply of that controlled substance are presumed to be valid.
(5) A state licensing board shall employ or obtain the services of a specialist in the treatment of pain and a
specialist in drug addiction to evaluate information received regarding a licensee's prescribing or dispensing
practices related to controlled substances if the board or its staff does not possess such expertise, to ascertain if
the licensee under investigation is engaging in improper, inappropriate, or illegal practices.
(6) Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, no state licensing board shall require that a grievance or complaint
against a licensee relating to controlled substances be sworn to or notarized, but the grievance or complaint
shall identify the name and address of the grievant or complainant, unless the board by administrative
regulation authorizes the filing of anonymous complaints. Any such authorizing administrative regulation shall
require that an anonymous complaint or grievance be accompanied by sufficient corroborating evidence as
would allow the board to believe, based upon a totality of the circumstances, that a reasonable probability
exists that the complaint or grievance is meritorious.
(7) Every state licensing board shall cooperate to the maximum extent permitted by law with all state, local, and
federal law enforcement agencies, and all professional licensing boards and agencies, state and federal, in the
United States or its territories in the coordination of actions to deter the improper, inappropriate, or illegal
prescribing or dispensing of a controlled substance.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) Each state licensing board shall require a fingerprint-supported criminal record check by the Department of
Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation of any applicant for initial licensure to practice
any profession authorized to prescribe or dispense controlled substances.
Section 7. KRS 218A.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may enter into reciprocal agreements or a
contract, either directly with any federal agency of the United States or its territories, any other state or states
of the United States or any jurisdiction, county, or political subdivision thereof, or with an organization
administering the exchange of interstate data on behalf of the prescription monitoring program of one (1) or
more states or jurisdictions, to share prescription drug monitoring information if the other prescription drug
monitoring program or data exchange program is compatible with the program in Kentucky. If the secretary
elects to evaluate the prescription drug monitoring program of another state, jurisdiction, or organization as
authorized by this section, priority shall be given to a state or jurisdiction that is contiguous with the borders of
the Commonwealth or an organization that offers connectivity with a contiguous state or jurisdiction.
(2) In determining compatibility, the secretary shall consider:
(a) The essential purposes of the program and the success of the program in fulfilling those purposes;
(b) The safeguards for privacy of patient records and its success in protecting patient privacy;
(c) The persons authorized to view the data collected by the program;
(d) The schedules of controlled substances monitored;
(e) The data required to be submitted on each prescription or dispensing;
(f) Any implementation criteria deemed essential for a thorough comparison; and
(g) The costs and benefits to the Commonwealth in mutually sharing particular information available in the
Commonwealth's database with the program under consideration.
(3) The secretary shall review any agreement on an annual basis to determine its continued compatibility with the
Kentucky prescription drug monitoring program.
(4) Any agreement between the cabinet and another state, jurisdiction, or organization shall prohibit the sharing of
information about a Kentucky resident, practitioner, pharmacist, or other prescriber or dispenser for any
purpose not otherwise authorized by this section or KRS 218A.202.
Section 8. KRS 304.17A-165 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for prescription drugs shall include an exceptions policy or an
override policy that provides coverage for the refill of a covered drug dispensed prior to the expiration of the
insured's supply of the drug. The insurer shall provide notice in existing written or electronic communications
to pharmacies doing business with the insurer, the pharmacy benefit manager if applicable, and to the insured
regarding the exceptions policy or override policy. This subsection shall not apply to controlled substances as
classified by KRS Chapter 218A.
(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from limiting payment to no more than three (3) refills of a
covered drug in a ninety (90) day period.
(3) Any individual or group health benefit plan that provides benefits for prescription drugs shall provide a
program for synchronization of medications when it is agreed among the insured, a provider, and a pharmacist
that synchronization of multiple prescriptions for the treatment of a chronic illness is in the best interest of the
patient for the management or treatment of a chronic illness provided that the medications:
(a) Are covered by the individual or group health benefit plan:
(b) Are used for treatment and management of chronic conditions that are subject to refills;
(c) Are not a Schedule II controlled substance[ or a Schedule III controlled substance containing
hydrocodone];
(d) Meet all prior authorization criteria specific to the medications at the time of the synchronization
request;
(e) Are of a formulation that can be effectively split over required short fill periods to achieve
synchronization; and

CHAPTER 38 21
(f) Do not have quantity limits or dose optimization criteria or requirements that would be violated in
fulfilling synchronization.
(4) To permit synchronization, an individual or group health benefit plan shall apply a prorated daily cost-sharing
rate to any medication dispensed by a network pharmacy pursuant to this section.
(5) Any dispensing fee shall not be prorated and shall be based on an individual prescription filled or refilled.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version